src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/adj-odd_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Odd syllable adjectives belonging to VIELG, CAHKK, MEAHTTUS, BEAKKAN, JOHTIL, GUOHCA, GARAS, LINIS, SUVRRIS, NANUS, LOSSAT, CAVGAT, CIENAL, NJUORAS, DILDDAS, VUOGAS, HEAHKAS, EATTAS, BOAKKAS, GAPPUS, VATTIS, BIEKKUS, LIEKKUS, GUOROS, NUOLUS, GEARGGUS, JIEDNAI, BOARIS, ALLAT, LAGAN, LAGAS

Tests:
  Adj - šealgat: # VIELG
    šealgat+A+Attr: šelges
    šealgat+A+Sg+Gen: šealgada
    šealgat+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: šealgat
    šealgat+A+Sg+Ill: šealgadii
    šealgat+A+Sg+Com: šealgadiin
    šealgat+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: šealgadiinna
    šealgat+A+Pl+Com: šealgadiiguin
    šealgat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [šealgadeappuid, šealgadabbuid]
    šealgat+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [šealgadebbuid, šealgadabbuid, šealgadeappuid]
    šealgat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [šealgadeappuid, šealgadabbuid]
    šealgat+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [šealgadeappuid, šealgadabbuid, šealgadebbuid]
    šealgat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: šealgadit

  Adj - loažžat: # CAHKK
    loažžat+A+Attr: [loažžadis, ložžes]
    loažžat+A+Sg+Gen: loažžada
    loažžat+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: loažžat
    loažžat+A+Sg+Ill: loažžadii
    loažžat+A+Sg+Com: loažžadiin
    loažžat+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: loažžadiinna
    loažžat+A+Pl+Com: loažžadiiguin
    loažžat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [loažžadeappuid, loažžadabbuid]
    loažžat+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [loažžadebbuid, loažžadabbuid, loažžadeappuid]
    loažžat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [loažžadeappuid, loažžadabbuid]
    loažžat+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [loažžadeappuid, loažžadabbuid, loažžadebbuid]
    loažžat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: loažžadit

  Adj - guoskkatmeahttun: # MEAHTTUS
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Attr: guoskkatmeahttun
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Gen: [guoskkatmeahttun, guoskkatmeahttuma]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Ill: guoskkatmeahttumii
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Com: guoskkatmeahttumiin
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: guoskkatmeahttumiinna
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Pl+Com: guoskkatmeahttumiiguin
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [guoskkatmeahttuseappuid, guoskkatmeahttusabbuid]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [guoskkatmeahttuseappuid, guoskkatmeahttusabbuid]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [guoskkatmeahttuseappuid, guoskkatmeahttusabbuid]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [guoskkatmeahttuseappuid, guoskkatmeahttusabbuid]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [guoskkatmeahttusit, guoskkatmeahttumit]

  Adj - nevvot: # BEAKKAN
    nevvot+A+Attr: nevvot
    nevvot+A+Err/Orth+Attr: nevvogis
    nevvot+A+Sg+Gen: [nevvoga, nevvot]
    nevvot+A+Sg+Ill: nevvogii
    nevvot+A+Sg+Com: nevvogiin
    nevvot+A+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth: nevvogiinna
    nevvot+A+Pl+Com: nevvogiiguin
    nevvot+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [nevvogeappuid, nevvogabbuid]
    nevvot+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [nevvogeappuid, nevvogebbuid, nevvogabbuid]
    nevvot+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [nevvogeappuid, nevvogebbuid, nevvogabbuid]
    nevvot+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [nevvogeappuid, nevvogabbuid]
    nevvot+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: nevvogit

  Adj - doaibmil: # JOHTIL
    doaibmil+A+Attr: doaibmilis
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Gen: doaibmila
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: doaibmil
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Ill: doaibmilii
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Com: doaibmiliin
    doaibmil+A+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth: doaibmiliinna
    doaibmil+A+Pl+Com: doaibmiliiguin
    doaibmil+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [doaibmileappuid, doaibmilabbuid]
    doaibmil+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [doaibmileappuid, doaibmilebbuid, doaibmilabbuid]
    doaibmil+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [doaibmileappuid, doaibmilebbuid, doaibmilabbuid]
    doaibmil+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [doaibmileappuid, doaibmilabbuid]
    doaibmil+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: doaibmilit

  Adj - meađmma: # GUOHCA
    meađmma+A+Attr: meađmma
    meađmma+A+Sg+Gen: [meađmmaga, meađbmaga]
    meađmma+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: [meađmmat, meađbmat]
    meađmma+A+Sg+Ill: [meađmmagii, meađbmagii]
    meađmma+A+Sg+Com: [meađmmagiin, meađbmagiin]
    meađmma+A+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth: [meađmmagiinna, meađbmagiinna]
    meađmma+A+Pl+Com: [meađmmagiiguin, meađbmagiiguin]
    meađmma+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [meađmmageappuid, meađmmagabbuid,meađbmageappuid, meađbmagabbuid]
    meađmma+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [meađmmageappuid, meađmmagebbuid, meađmmagabbuid, meađbmageappuid, meađbmagebbuid, meađbmagabbuid]
    meađmma+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [meađmmageappuid, meađmmagebbuid, meađmmagabbuid, meađbmageappuid, meađbmagebbuid, meađbmagabbuid]
    meađmma+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [meađmmageappuid, meađmmagabbuid, meađbmageappuid, meađbmagabbuid]
    meađmma+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [meađmmagit, meađbmagit]

  Adj - ceaikkas: # GARAS
    ceaikkas+A+Attr: ceaika
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Gen: ceaikasa
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: ceaikas
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Ill: ceaikasii
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Com: ceaikasiin
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: ceaikasiinna
    ceaikkas+A+Pl+Com: ceaikasiiguin
    ceaikkas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [ceaikaseappuid, ceaikasabbuid]
    ceaikkas+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [ceaikaseappuid, ceaikasebbuid, ceaikasabbuid]
    ceaikkas+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [ceaikaseappuid, ceaikasebbuid, ceaikasabbuid]
    ceaikkas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [ceaikaseappuid, ceaikasabbuid]
    ceaikkas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: ceaikasit
    
  Adj - dimis: # LINIS
    dimis+A+Attr: dipma
    dimis+A+Sg+Gen: dipmása
    dimis+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: dipmás
    dimis+A+Sg+Ill: dipmásii
    dimis+A+Sg+Com: dipmásiin
    dimis+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: dipmásiinna
    dimis+A+Pl+Com: dipmásiiguin
    dimis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [dipmáseappuid, dipmásabbuid]
    dimis+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [dipmáseappuid, dipmásebbuid, dipmásabbuid]
    dimis+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [dipmáseappuid, dipmásebbuid, dipmásabbuid]
    dimis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [dipmáseappuid, dipmásabbuid]
    dimis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: dipmásit

  Adj - suvrris: # SUVRRIS
    suvrris+A+Attr: suvrra
    suvrris+Err/Orth+A+Attr: suvre
    suvrris+A+Sg+Gen: suvrása
    suvrris+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Gen: suvrá
    suvrris+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: suvrás
    suvrris+A+Sg+Ill: suvrásii
    suvrris+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Ill: suvrái
    suvrris+A+Sg+Com: suvrásiin
    suvrris+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: suvrásiinna
    suvrris+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Com: suvráin
    suvrris+A+Pl+Com: suvrásiiguin
    suvrris+Err/Orth+A+Pl+Com: suvráiguin
    suvrris+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [suvráseappuid, suvrásabbuid]
    suvrris+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [suvráseappuid, suvrásebbuid, suvrásabbuid]
    suvrris+Err/Orth+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: suvrribuid
    suvrris+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [suvráseappuid, suvrásebbuid, suvrásabbuid]
    suvrris+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [suvráseappuid, suvrásabbuid]
    suvrris+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: suvrásit
    suvrris+Err/Orth+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: suvrrit

  Adj - nanus: # NANUS
    nanus+A+Attr: [nanu, nana]
    nanus+A+Sg+Gen: nannosa
    nanus+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: nannos
    nanus+A+Sg+Ill: nannosii
    nanus+A+Sg+Com: nannosiin
    nanus+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: nannosiinna
    nanus+A+Pl+Com: nannosiiguin
    nanus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [nannoseappuid, nannosabbuid]
    nanus+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [nannoseappuid, nannosebbuid, nannosabbuid]
    nanus+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [nannoseappuid, nannosebbuid, nannosabbuid]
    nanus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [nannoseappuid, nannosabbuid]
    nanus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: nannosit
    nanus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth: nannuseppot
    
  Adj - lossat: # LOSSAT
    lossat+A+Attr: lossa
    lossat+A+Sg+Gen: lossada
    lossat+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: lossat
    lossat+A+Sg+Ill: lossadii
    lossat+A+Sg+Com: lossadiin
    lossat+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: lossadiinna
    lossat+A+Pl+Com: lossadiiguin
    lossat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [lossadeappuid, lossadabbuid]
    lossat+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [lossadeappuid, lossadebbuid, lossadabbuid]
    lossat+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [lossadeappuid, lossadebbuid, lossadabbuid]
    lossat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [lossadeappuid, lossadabbuid]
    lossat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: lossadit

  Adj - njuolgat: # CAVGAT
    njuolgat+A+Attr: [njuolga, njulges]
    njuolgat+A+Sg+Gen: njuolgada
    njuolgat+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: njuolgat
    njuolgat+A+Sg+Ill: njuolgadii
    njuolgat+A+Sg+Com: njuolgadiin
    njuolgat+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: njuolgadiinna
    njuolgat+A+Pl+Com: njuolgadiiguin
    njuolgat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [njuolgadeappuid, njuolgadabbuid]
    njuolgat+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [njuolgadeappuid, njuolgadebbuid, njuolgadabbuid]
    njuolgat+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [njuolgadeappuid, njuolgadebbuid, njuolgadabbuid]
    njuolgat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [njuolgadeappuid, njuolgadabbuid]
    njuolgat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: njuolgadit

  Adj - čieŋal: # CIENAL
    čieŋal+A+Attr: čiekŋalis
    čieŋal+A+Sg+Gen: čiekŋala
    čieŋal+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: čiekŋal
    čieŋal+A+Sg+Ill: čiekŋalii
    čieŋal+A+Sg+Com: čiekŋaliin
    čieŋal+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: čiekŋaliinna
    čieŋal+A+Pl+Com: čiekŋaliiguin
    čieŋal+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [čiekŋaleappuid, čiekŋalabbuid]
    čieŋal+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [čiekŋaleappuid, čiekŋalebbuid, čiekŋalabbuid]
    čieŋal+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [čiekŋaleappuid, čiekŋalebbuid, čiekŋalabbuid]
    čieŋal+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [čiekŋaleappuid, čiekŋalabbuid]
    čieŋal+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: čiekŋalit

  Adj - stoaiddas: # NJUORAS
    stoaiddas+A+Attr: [stoaida, stoaiddas]
    stoaiddas+A+Sg+Gen: stoaidasa
    stoaiddas+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: stoaidas
    stoaiddas+A+Sg+Ill: stoaidasii
    stoaiddas+A+Sg+Com: stoaidasiin
    stoaiddas+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: stoaidasiinna
    stoaiddas+A+Pl+Com: stoaidasiiguin
    stoaiddas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [stoaidaseappuid, stoaidasabbuid]
    stoaiddas+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [stoaidaseappuid, stoaidasebbuid, stoaidasabbuid]
    stoaiddas+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [stoaidaseappuid, stoaidasebbuid, stoaidasabbuid]
    stoaiddas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [stoaidaseappuid, stoaidasabbuid]
    stoaiddas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: stoaidasit

  Adj - suohtas: # DILDDAS
    suohtas+A+Attr: [suohtasis, suohtas]
    suohtas+A+Sg+Gen: suohttasa
    suohtas+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: suohttas
    suohtas+A+Sg+Ill: suohttasii
    suohtas+A+Sg+Com: suohttasiin
    suohtas+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: suohttasiinna
    suohtas+A+Pl+Com: suohttasiiguin
    suohtas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [suohttaseappuid, suohttasabbuid]
    suohtas+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [suohttaseappuid, suohttasebbuid, suohttasabbuid]
    suohtas+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [suohttaseappuid, suohttasebbuid, suohttasabbuid]
    suohtas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [suohttaseappuid, suohttasabbuid]
    suohtas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: suohttasit

  Adj - vuogas: # VUOGAS
    vuogas+A+Attr: vuogas
    vuogas+A+Sg+Gen: vuohkkasa
    vuogas+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: vuohkkas
    vuogas+A+Sg+Ill: vuohkkasii
    vuogas+A+Sg+Com: vuohkkasiin
    vuogas+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: vuohkkasiinna
    vuogas+A+Pl+Com: vuohkkasiiguin
    vuogas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [vuohkkaseappuid, vuohkkasabbuid]
    vuogas+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [vuohkkaseappuid, vuohkkasebbuid, vuohkkasabbuid]
    vuogas+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [vuohkkaseappuid, vuohkkasebbuid, vuohkkasabbuid]
    vuogas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [vuohkkaseappuid, vuohkkasabbuid]
    vuogas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: vuohkkasit
